California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, a franchisee shall not be precluded from purchasing fuel from any available source if the franchisor is unable or refuses to supply the franchisee with fuel.

Failure to deliver contracted, agreed upon, or requested quantities of fuel within 72 hours of such specified contract time, agreement, or request shall constitute an inability or refusal to supply a franchisee. Requests for deliveries of fuel may be telephoned to the franchisor, except that when the franchisee intends to seek fuel from another supplier pursuant to Section 21140.1 should the franchisor be unable or refuse to supply him or her, a request for fuel must be made in writing to a franchisor at least 48 hours before desired delivery.

Once such notice has been given, and the franchisor has failed to deliver contracted, agreed upon, or requested quantities of fuel no further written request shall be required from the franchisee until such time as the franchisor notifies the franchisee in writing that the franchisor is prepared to deliver contracted, agreed upon, or requested quantities of fuel.

Nondelivery of fuel by the franchisor due to accident, fire, theft or other similar acts shall not constitute an inability or refusal to supply the franchisee.

If the franchisee sells fuel supplied from a source other than the franchisor, the franchisee shall prominently post a sign disclosing this fact to the public on each pump dispensing fuel purchased from other than the franchisor. The sign shall not be smaller than 8″ x 10″ with letters not less than three inches in height.

This provision shall not be construed to permit a franchisee to purchase more fuel than may be allowed by any federal statute or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.2.

From the effective date of this section it shall be illegal for any franchisor by any action to require a franchisee to purchase only those tires, batteries, motor oil, and other automotive accessories sold by the franchisor. A franchised retail gasoline dealer may sell any tires, batteries, motor oil, and other automotive accessories as may be available to him or her for retail sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.3.

The franchisor’s executive officer, representative, or agent of the franchisor who negotiates any contract in violation of this chapter or who otherwise coerces a franchisee in violation of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each offense. That penalty, reasonable attorney fees and costs of the suit shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty, attorney fees, and costs of the suit shall be paid to the treasurer of the county where the action was brought and one-half shall be paid to the State Treasurer. If brought by a city attorney, one-half of the penalty, attorney fees, and costs of the suit shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.4.

Any person who is injured in his business or property by reason of a violation of this chapter may sue therefor in any court having jurisdiction in the county where the defendant resides or is found, or any agent resides or is found, or where service may be obtained, without respect to the amount in controversy, and to recover three times the damages sustained by him, and shall be awarded attorneys’ fees together with the costs of the suit. Any action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.6.

(a) On and after January 1, 1980, it shall be unlawful to include in any franchise agreement any term which provides for the termination of the franchise by the franchisor upon the death of the franchisee if the franchisee, prior to his demise, designates a successor-in-interest in a form prescribed by and delivered to the franchisor.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “successor-in-interest” shall be restricted to either a surviving spouse or adult child of the franchisee, provided that such spouse or child, at the time of the franchisee’s death, shall meet the reasonable qualifications then being required of dealers by the franchisor for the operation of such service stations.

(c) This section shall not apply to a “trial franchise” as defined in the Petroleum Marketing Practices Act (Public Law 95-297).

(d) The designated successor-in-interest shall be allowed 21 days after the death of the franchisee to give written notice of his or her election to assume and operate the franchise. The notification shall contain such information regarding business experience and creditworthiness as is reasonably required by the franchisor. The successor-in-interest must offer to assume the franchise in writing three days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays) after such election and must commence operation of the franchise within 10 days after it has been assumed.

(e) Franchisors may require that franchisees desiring to designate a successor-in-interest pursuant to this section deposit with the franchisor at the time of such designation such sum as would be reasonably estimated to be necessary to compensate the franchisor for rent for a period of 21 days. This deposit is intended to compensate the franchisor in the event the designated successor-in-interest fails for such period after the death of the franchisee to assume the franchise obligation. Any unearned portion of such deposit resulting from the successor-in-interest assuming responsibility for the franchise sooner than 21 days after the date of the franchisee’s death, or from the temporary operation of the facility by the franchisor during such 21 days, shall be refunded by the franchisor to the estate or legal representative of the deceased franchisee. In addition to such deposit, the franchisor may require a franchisee desiring to qualify under this section to arrange for the discharge or performance of other franchise obligations such as, but not limited to, insurance, but excluding any obligation to be open to the public, for a period of up to 21 days after his demise.

(f) The franchise available to the successor-in-interest pursuant to this section is intended to be no greater than or less than the franchise as it existed in the name of the deceased franchisee at the time of such franchisee’s death. This section is not intended to expand or diminish the rights of franchisors or franchisees under either federal or state law.

(g) A franchisee may designate a primary and one alternate successor-in-interest. The alternate, if one is designated, shall have no rights under this section in the event of any exercise of rights by the primary successor-in-interest. If an alternate desires to assume and operate the franchise in the event the primary successor-in-interest fails to do so, the alternate must give notice of such election and otherwise comply with paragraph (d) of this section.

(h) Unless otherwise specifically provided herein, any actions to be performed by the franchisor or by the successor-in-interest hereunder shall in each instance be performed within a reasonable time.

(i) Unless the franchisor otherwise agrees in writing, there shall be no operation of the franchise following the death of the franchisee by anyone (other than the franchisor for its own account) until all parts of the franchise have been expressly assumed as herein provided, including, but not limited to, such items as lease or leases, products agreement, loaned equipment agreement, federal and state environmental law compliance agreements, licensing, and tax permits.

(j) Following the death of a franchisee, and prior to the operation of the franchise by the successor-in-interest as herein provided, the franchisor shall have the option to operate the franchise by contract or otherwise for its own account without obligation or duty to the heirs or estate of the deceased franchisee or to the successor-in-interest except for the obligation to account to the heirs or the estate of the deceased franchisee for the inapplicable portion of any prepaid rent or other sums prepaid to the franchisor, and for any physical inventory salvaged from the franchise and used or sold by the franchisor.

(k) If the successor-in-interest assumes the franchise and there has been no intervening operation of the franchise by the franchisor, the successor-in-interest shall account to the heirs or estate of the deceased franchisee for the value or other disposition of personal property of the franchisee located at or related to the franchise.

(l) The liability for failure to comply with this section shall be limited to those damages provided by Section 3300 of the Civil Code. Any action pursuant to this section shall be commenced within one year after the cause of action accrued.

(m) In the event any provision of this section is deemed void or unenforceable, the remaining portions, to the extent severable, shall be given effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 972.)
-------------------------------------------

21148.

(a) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, a franchisor may not withhold its consent to the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise by the franchisee to another person unless the franchisor demonstrates in writing to the franchisee within 45 days of receiving the application, or required paperwork, from the potential buyer any of the following:

(1) The proposed purchaser of the franchise has less business experience and training than that normally required by the franchisor of prospective franchisees.

(2) The proposed purchaser of the franchise has less financial resources than that normally required by the franchisor of prospective franchisees.

(3) The proposed purchaser of the franchise does not satisfy the then-current uniformly applied requirements, if any, of the franchisor applicable to prospective franchisees.

(4) The proposed purchaser of the franchise operates a franchise under an agreement with a franchisor other than the franchisor to whom the sale, transfer, or assignment is proposed, if the then-current uniformly applied requirements, if any, of the franchisor precludes prospective franchisees from operating a franchise under an agreement with another franchisor.

(5) The franchisee has not offered in writing to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise to the franchisor on terms and conditions which are the same as those of the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise to the proposed purchaser; and the franchisee has not allowed the franchisor at least 30 days in which to either accept or decline the franchisee’s written offer, prior to the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise to the proposed purchaser.

(b) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, a franchisor may not withhold its consent to the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise by the franchisee to another person for the purposes of diminishing the market value of the franchise.

(c) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, a franchisor may not withhold its consent to the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise by the franchisee to another person because that other person is of foreign origin or is non-English speaking as long as the prospective franchisee is able to adequately communicate with the franchisor and the appropriate federal, state, and local governmental agencies concerning matters of management, operations, environmental compliance, and public safety.

(d) If the franchisor consents to the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise to a prospective purchaser, the franchisor may require the franchisee to pay a transfer fee to the franchisor, provided the amount of the fee is reasonable when compared to the sale price of the franchise and provided the fee is not required in an effort to frustrate the proposed sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21149.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, the franchisor may not prohibit or prevent the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise to a corporation if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The franchisee has a controlling interest in the corporation.

(b) The franchisee offers in writing to personally guarantee the corporation’s performance of its obligations under the franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 698, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.9. Hours of Business [21150. - 21150.1.]

21150.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Franchise” means any contract between a refiner and a distributor, between a refiner and a retailer, between a distributor and another distributor, or between a distributor and a retailer, under which a refiner or distributor authorizes or permits a retailer or distributor to use, in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel, a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such use. The term “franchise” includes the following:

(1) Any contract under which a retailer or distributor is authorized or permitted to occupy leased marketing premises, which premises are to be employed in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel under a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such occupancy.

(2) Any contract pertaining to the supply of fuel which is to be sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned or controlled by a refiner, or under a contract which has existed continuously since May 15, 1973, and pursuant to which, on May 15, 1973, fuel was sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned and controlled on such date by a refiner.

(3) The unexpired portion of any franchise, as defined by the preceding provisions of this paragraph, which is transferred or assigned as authorized by the provisions of such franchise or by any applicable provision of state law which permits such transfer or assignment without regard to any provision of the franchise.

(b) “Franchisor” means a refiner or distributor who authorizes or permits, under a franchise, a retailer or distributor to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(c) “Franchisee” means a retailer or distributor who is authorized or permitted, under a franchise, to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(d) “Refiner” means any person engaged in the refining of crude oil to produce fuel, and includes any affiliate of such person.

(e) “Distributor” means any person, including any affiliate of such person, who either purchases fuel for sale, consignment, or distribution to another, or receives fuel on consignment for consignment or distribution to his or her own fuel accounts or to accounts of his or her supplier, but shall not include a person who is an employee of, or merely serves as a common carrier providing transportation service for, such supplier.

(f) “Retailer” means any person who purchases fuel for sale to the general public for ultimate consumption.

(g) “Marketing premises” means, in the case of any franchise, premises which, under such franchise, are to be employed by the franchisee in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(h) “Leased marketing premises” means marketing premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled by a franchisor and which the franchisee is authorized or permitted, under the franchise, to employ in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(i) “Contract” means any oral or written agreement. For supply purposes, delivery levels during the same month of the previous year shall be prima facie evidence of an agreement to deliver such levels.

(j) “Trademark” means any trademark, trade name, service mark, or other identifying symbol or name.

(k) “Fuel” means gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel.

(l) “Affiliate” means any person who, other than by means of a franchise, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any other person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

21150.1.

(a) In all future franchise agreements no retail gasoline dealer who operates pursuant to a franchise shall be required by the franchisor to operate the service station during hours that are not profitable to the franchisee, provided that the hours of operation that are maintained by the franchisee are for a continuing period of time.

(b) In the event that the terms and conditions of the franchise require the franchisee to maintain hours of operation that the franchisee has determined in good faith to be unprofitable, the franchisee shall notify the franchisor in writing of his or her determination that a certain period or periods are not profitable and provide the franchisor with any statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents that the franchisee prepared or reviewed to determine that operation of the service station during the period or periods specified in the notice were unprofitable.

(c) In the event that the franchisor in good faith is not satisfied that the operation of the service station is not profitable during the periods specified in the notice after the franchisor has reviewed the statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents submitted by the franchisee, the franchisor may prepare its own statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents regarding the profitability of operation of the service station during the period specified by the franchisee. The franchisee shall reimburse the franchisor for the actual cost incurred by the franchisor in preparing any statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents to verify the franchisee’s determination that it is not profitable to operate during the period or periods specified in the notice, not to exceed the sum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(d) In the event that the franchisor and franchisee still do not agree regarding the profitability of certain hours of operation, the franchisor and franchisee shall conduct arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association. The decision of the arbitrator shall be final.

(e) The franchisee may establish and maintain the hours of operation of the service station without regard to the hours specified in the franchise:

(1) If the franchisor fails to notify the franchisee of his or her intent to prepare statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents to verify the franchisee’s determination that it is not profitable to operate during the period or periods specified in the notice within 15 days after receipt of the franchisee’s notice.

(2) If the franchisor fails to complete the preparation of the statements, studies, analyses, summaries, business records, or other documents within 30 days after the receipt of notice from the franchisee.

(3) If it is established pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, that the operation of the service station is not profitable during the period or periods specified by the franchisee.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the terms “unprofitable” and “not profitable” shall mean that the amount of the gross revenues generated by the sales of motor fuels and other petroleum products, as well as related automotive accessories, is less than the amount of the expenses incurred by the franchisee to operate during the period or periods the franchisee specified in the written notice, including the proportionate costs for rent, labor, or other fixed or variable overhead costs that may be reasonably allocated to the operation of the service station during the period or periods that the franchisee specified in the written notice.

(g) This section shall not apply:

(1) Where specific hours of business or operation are required under the franchisor’s prime lease or license from any governmental entity, airport, parking, marine or port authority, shopping center, or any private investor not affiliated with or controlled by the franchisor; or,

(2) Where the retail gasoline station subject to the franchise agreement is located within one-half mile access of any highway which is a part of the California freeway and expressway system, provided, however, that if there is not commercial property developed as a service station within one-half mile of an entry to or exit from any such highway, the exception shall extend to the first such development and extend one-quarter mile beyond in all directions. This section is also not applicable to any business which is not primarily a gasoline station, but which sells gasoline incidentally to its business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Unfair Practices [21200. - 21203.]

21200.

It is unlawful for any refiner, distributor, manufacturer, or transporter of motor vehicle fuels or oils engaged in business in this state, either directly or indirectly, to discriminate in price between different purchasers of motor vehicle fuels or oils of like grade and quality, where the effect of such discrimination is to lessen competition, or to injure, destroy, or prevent competition with any person who either grants or knowingly receives the benefit of such discrimination, or with customers of either of them.

Upon proof being made, at any hearing on a complaint under this section, that there has been such discrimination in price, the burden of rebutting the prima facie case thus made by showing justification shall be upon the person charged with a violation of this section. Nothing herein contained shall prevent a seller rebutting the prima facie case thus made by showing that his lower price to any purchaser or purchasers was made in good faith to meet an equally low price of a competitor and was also offered to any other of his purchasers in competition with the purchaser or purchasers receiving such lower price. If such lower price should be incorporated into a term contract, no such contract shall as to such discriminatory price be valid for more than one year.

Nothing in this section shall prevent differentials which make only due allowance for differences in the cost of manufacture, marketing, transportation, sale, or delivery resulting from the differing methods or quantities in which such commodities are to such purchasers sold or delivered.

Nothing in this section shall prevent persons engaged in selling motor vehicle fuels or oils in this state from selecting their own customers in bona fide transactions and not in restraint of trade.

Nothing in this section shall prevent price changes from time to time where in response to changing conditions affecting the market for, or the marketability of, the products concerned, such as, but not limited to, actual or imminent deterioration of products, distress sales under court process, or sales in good faith in discontinuance of business in the products concerned.

Nothing in this section shall apply to the purchase of motor vehicle fuels or oils for their own use by state and local agencies or public utilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

The provisions of this chapter shall only apply to refiners, distributors, manufacturers, or transporters of petroleum products engaged in business in this state whose total production, gasoline refining capacity or sales volume at the wholesale level is 50,000 barrels a day or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

21202.

Any person injured by any violation of the provisions of this chapter may bring an action for the recovery of damages. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

The Legislature finds and declares that distribution and sales of motor vehicle fuels and oils in the State of California affect the general economy of the state, the public interest and the public welfare. Competition and freedom from unreasonable discriminatory practices are essential to the fair and efficient functioning of a free market economy. Competitive conditions are rapidly changing with resulting market dislocation. Therefore, it is further provided that any existing contracts, arrangements, or agreements with provision for prices not in compliance with this chapter shall be void on and after the effective date of this chapter as to such provisions, except for any as may be required to be extended beyond said date to comply with any applicable federal price control laws, regulations or orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. Consumer Wheelchair Right to Repair [21300. - 21305.]

21300.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Authorized repair provider” means an individual or business who is unaffiliated with an original equipment manufacturer and who has an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer, for a definite or indefinite period, under which the original equipment manufacturer grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the purposes of offering the services of inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of powered wheelchairs under the name of the original equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement with the original equipment
 manufacturer to offer those services on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer. An original equipment manufacturer who offers the services of inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of its own powered wheelchairs, and who does not have an arrangement described in this subdivision with an unaffiliated individual or business, shall be considered an authorized repair provider with respect to that equipment.

(b) “Documentation” means any manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, schematic, or other guidance or information used in effecting the services of inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of powered wheelchairs.

(c) “Embedded software” means any programmable instructions provided on firmware delivered with an electronic component of equipment,
 or with a part for that equipment, for purposes of equipment operation, including all relevant patches and fixes made by the manufacturer of the equipment or part for these purposes.

(d) “Equipment” means a powered wheelchair.

(e) (1) “Fair and reasonable terms and costs,” with respect to obtaining documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools from a manufacturer to provide services, means terms that are equivalent to the most favorable terms that the manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider and costs that are no greater than the manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

(2) For documentation, including any relevant updates, “fair and reasonable terms” also means at no charge, except
 that, when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge may be included for the reasonable actual costs of preparing and sending the copy.

(3) For software tools, “fair and reasonable terms” also means all of the following:

(A) Provided at no charge and without requiring authorization or internet access.

(B) Without imposing impediments to access or use, in the course of effecting the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair and without impairing the efficient and cost-effective performance of the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair.

(C) Enables full functionality.

(4) If an
 original equipment manufacturer does not utilize an authorized repair provider, “fair and reasonable terms” means an equitable price in consideration of the actual cost to the original equipment manufacturer to prepare and distribute the part, tool, service access method, or documentation, exclusive of any research and development costs incurred.

(f) “Firmware” means a software program or set of instructions programmed on equipment, or on a part for that equipment, to allow the equipment or part to communicate within itself or with other computer hardware.

(g) “Independent repair provider” means an individual or business, other than the manufacturer, that is engaged in the services of inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of equipment for purposes of returning it to the
 safety and performance specifications established by the manufacturer and to meet its original intended use.

(h) “Original equipment manufacturer” means a business engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new equipment or parts manufactured by, or on behalf of, itself, to any individual or business.

(i) “Part” means any replacement part, either new or used, made available by an original equipment manufacturer for purposes of effecting the services of inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of powered wheelchairs manufactured by, or on behalf of, sold, or otherwise supplied by the original equipment manufacturer.

(j) “Powered wheelchair” means a motorized wheeled device designed for
 use by a person with a physical disability.

(k) “Tools” means any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus used in inspection, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of powered wheelchairs, including software or other mechanisms that provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate functionality, or perform any other function required to bring the product back to fully functional condition.

(l) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21301.

(a) For the purpose of providing services for equipment in the state, an original equipment manufacturer shall, with fair and reasonable terms and costs, make available to an independent repair provider or owner of the manufacturer’s equipment, documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools that are intended for use with the equipment or any part listed in subdivision (c), including updates to documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools.

(b) Regarding subdivision (c), with respect to equipment that contains an electronic security lock or other security-related function, an original equipment manufacturer shall, with fair and reasonable terms and costs, make available to independent repair providers and owners documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools needed to reset the lock or function when disabled in the course of providing services. The manufacturer may make the documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools available to independent repair providers and owners through appropriate secure release
 systems.

(c) For powered wheelchairs subject to Section 14132.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, this section shall not apply to any part that would require programmability, calibration, or clinical involvement to ensure appropriate patient seating and positioning. Items included in this section for powered wheelchairs subject to Section 14132.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall include:

(1) Batteries.

(2) Battery chargers.

(3) Nonprogrammable joysticks.

(4) Joystick housings or brackets.

(5) Wheel assembly.

(6) Nonpositioning accessories.

(7) Antitip devices.

(8) Armrests, excluding positioning components designed for adjustment by a therapist or assistive technology professional.

(9) Caster spheres.

(10) Cosmetic shrouding.

(11) Floor mats.

(12) Floor plates.

(13) Nonpowered leg lowerers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21302.

(a) (1) An original equipment manufacturer who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, or who reasonably should have known that they violated any provision of this chapter, shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per powered wheelchair, not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), for a first violation.

(2) In the case of a first violation, an original equipment manufacturer who does not knowingly violate this chapter may be provided a three-day right to cure the violation before a civil penalty is imposed.

(3) An original equipment manufacturer who commits a second or subsequent violation of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per powered wheelchair, not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for each series of related violations.

(4) An original equipment manufacturer who fails to provide a part because it is out of stock and they are unable to obtain the part shall not be subject to the fines described in this subdivision if the original equipment manufacturer does both of the following:

(A) They inform the customer or independent repair provider that the part is out of stock, and, consequently, they are unable to obtain the part.

(B) They make
 the part available to the consumer or independent repair provider within three business days of when that part becomes available.

(b) An original equipment manufacturer who violates a court order or injunction issued pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(c) (1) Any person injured by violation of this chapter may bring a civil action for damages or other appropriate relief.

(2) The Attorney General or district attorney may bring a civil action in the name of the state for violation of this chapter.

(3) An action brought pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced
 within three years from the date of the alleged violation.

(d) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, the penalty collected shall be paid to the Office of the Attorney General to offset the reasonable expenses incurred in conducting that action, and any remainder thereafter shall be paid to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney, the entire amount of penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21303.

An independent repair provider that is not an authorized repair provider shall provide a written notice to any customer before providing repairs that contains the following information:

(a) The independent repair provider is not an authorized repair provider for the product.

(b) The consumer may wish to review the terms and conditions of any warranty for the equipment, as repairs not performed by a designated authorized repair provider could potentially affect the warranty.

(c) Warranties for consumer products are governed by the federal Magnuson-Moss Warranty
 Act (Chapter 50 (commencing with Section 2301) of Title 15 of the United States Code), which gives consumers rights and protections that apply over any conflicting provisions in the warranty.

(d) Under Magnuson-Moss, a warranty cannot generally require that maintenance repairs be performed only by an authorized repair provider, unless the Federal Trade Commission waives this prohibition, or the repair is provided free of charge, pursuant to that warranty.

(e) Under Magnuson-Moss, if damage to equipment is shown to be caused by faulty nonbrand equipment or by faulty repair by a nonauthorized repair provider, that damage may not be covered by the warranty, but the warranty may otherwise remain in effect.

(f) Under
 Section 14019.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, an independent repair provider that is a Medi-Cal enrolled provider is prohibited from seeking reimbursement or attempting to obtain
 payment for the cost of covered services from a Medi-Cal applicant or recipient, unless the beneficiary owes a share of the cost, as described in subdivision (g) of that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21304.

(a) This chapter does not require an original equipment manufacturer to divulge a trade secret, except as necessary to provide documentation, parts, tools, service access methods, and training courses and materials on fair and reasonable terms.

(1) An original equipment manufacturer may redact documentation to remove trade secrets from the documentation before providing access to the documentation if the usability of the redacted documentation for the purpose of providing services is not diminished.

(2) An original equipment manufacturer may withhold information regarding a component of, design of,
 functionality of, or process of developing a part, embedded software, firmware, or
 a tool if the information is a trade secret and the usability of the part, embedded software, firmware, or tool for the purpose of providing services is not diminished.

(b) This chapter does not require an original equipment manufacturer to make available a part if the part is no longer available to the original equipment manufacturer.

(c) An original equipment manufacturer is not liable for faulty or otherwise improper repairs provided by independent repair providers or owners, including faulty or otherwise improper repairs that cause any of the following:

(1) Damage to a powered wheelchair that occurs during the repairs.

(2) Any indirect,
 incidental, or consequential damages.

(3) An inability to use, or a reduced functionality of, a powered wheelchair resulting from faulty or otherwise improper repair.

(d) This chapter shall not be construed to alter the terms of any arrangement described in subdivision (a) of Section 21300 in force between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment manufacturer, including, but not limited to, the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer pursuant to an arrangement described in subdivision (a) of Section 21300, except that any provision that purports to waive, avoid, restrict, or limit the original equipment manufacturer’s obligations to comply with this chapter shall be void
 and unenforceable.

(e) This chapter shall not be construed to exempt an original equipment manufacturer from a products liability claim that is
 otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------
